Wyoming, session 2025, HB0198.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-903(a), as created by 2024
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 108, Section 1 and effective
January 1, 2025, is amended to read:

21-2-903. Education savings accounts; Wyoming
education savings accounts expenditure account.

(a) The total amount to be deposited in an education
savings account for an ESA student each year shall be
HB0198

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0582
determined by the student's household income compared to
the federal poverty levels, using the most recent federal
poverty guidelines for the student's household size and
income, as follows:;

(i) Six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) for
students whose household income is at or below equal to or
less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal
poverty level;.

(ii) Four thousand eight hundred dollars
($4,800.00) for students whose household income is more
than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal
poverty level but equal to or less than two hundred percent
(200%) of the federal poverty level;

(iii) Three thousand six hundred dollars
($3,600.00) for students whose household income is more
than two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty
level but equal to or less than two hundred fifty percent
(250%) of the federal poverty level.

HB0198

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0582
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0198